Wyoming, session 2025, SF0174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The Legislature finds that:
(i) The people of Wyoming did "ordain and
establish" the Wyoming Constitution (Wyoming Constitution,
Preamble);
(ii) The Wyoming Legislature derives its powers
from the Wyoming Constitution and its acts must be conformable
to it:
Legislatures…[are] Creatures of the Constitution;
they owe their existence to the Constitution: they
derive their powers from the Constitution: it is
their commission; and, therefore, all their acts
must be conformable to it, or else they will be
void. Moore v. Harper, 600 U.S. 1 (2023) (internal
citations omitted);
(iii) Article 20, Section 1 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides that the Wyoming Constitution may be
amended, and specifies in what manner;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0174
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) The apportionment provisions of the Wyoming
Constitution "are quite clear, explicit and mandatory…[and]
leave no room for confusion or doubt as to what the
legislature is to do about reapportionment and when it is to
do it." (State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299, 301
(Wyo. 1963));
(v) Article 3, Section 3 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides in relevant part:
Each county shall constitute a senatorial and
representative district; the senate and house of
representatives shall be composed of members
elected by the legal voters of the counties
respectively, every two (2) years. They shall be
apportioned among the said counties as nearly as
may be according to the number of their
inhabitants. Each county shall have at least one
senator and one representative; but at no time
shall the number of members of the house of
representatives be less than twice nor greater than
three times the number of members of the senate….
(Wyo. Const. Art. 3 sec. 3)
(vi) Article 3, Section 48 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides:
At the first budget session of the legislature
following the federal census, the legislature shall
reapportion its membership based upon that census.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this
article, any bill to apportion the legislature may
be introduced in a budget session in the same manner
as in a general session. (Wyo. Const. Art. 3 sec.
48)
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0174
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Since 1992 the Wyoming Legislature, contrary
to Wyoming's constitutional apportionment provisions, has
allowed for the creation of legislative districts that do not
follow county lines and legislative districts that do not
have at least one (1) representative and one (1) senator per
county;
(viii) Apportionment for the Wyoming Legislature
must also conform with the Equal Protection Clause of the 14th
Amendment under which the overriding objective is "that the
vote of any citizen is approximately equal in weight to that
of any other citizen in the State." (Reynolds v. Sims, 377
U.S. 533, 579 (1964));
(ix) Conformance to both the federal and state
constitutions may be best achieved with a legislature of
manageable size;
(x) No inconsistency exists between the
requirements of Wyoming Constitution Article 3, Sections 3
and 48 and those of the Equal Protection clause of the 14th
Amendment to the United States constitution and the Wyoming
Legislature must fully comply with both constitutions in
apportioning for legislative elections.
Section 2.
(a) The Legislature further finds that:
(i) The Legislature shall make a good faith effort
to apportion itself as required by the 14th Amendment in
conformance with the principle that the vote of any citizen
is approximately equal in weight to that of any other citizen
in the State; and
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0174
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) The Legislature shall make a good faith
effort to apportion itself as required by Article 3, Section
3 and 48 of the Wyoming Constitution by providing for
legislative districts that follow county lines and
legislative districts that have at least one (1)
representative and one (1) senator per county.
Section 3. The Management Council of the Wyoming
Legislature shall assign a committee of the Legislature to
study apportionment of the Legislature as provided by this
act during the 2025 interim. The assigned committee shall
conduct meetings in communities around Wyoming to take input
on apportionment options from members of the public and other
interested stakeholders. The committee shall report its
findings to the Legislature not later than December 1, 2025.
The committee or Management Council may introduce legislation
to constitutionally apportion the Legislature for
introduction in the 2026 budget session of the Wyoming
Legislature.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0174
ENROLLED ACT NO. 73, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as
provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5